Idaho, session 2026, H0685.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 9, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-915D, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-915D. USE OF MASK OR DISGUISE DURING CRIMINAL OFFENSE -- SENTENC-
ING ENHANCEMENT. (1) It shall be unlawful for any individual to wear a mask or
other device that covers, hides, or conceals any portion of the individual's
face while committing or attempting to commit a felony crime or misdemeanor
assault, battery, indecent exposure, sexual exploitation of a child, or sex-
ual battery.
(2) A person who violates the provisions of this section while commit-
ting or attempting to commit another criminal offense may, upon conviction,
be subject to an enhanced penalty in addition to the sentence imposed for the
underlying offense. Such enhancement shall consist of an additional fine
not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), an additional term
of imprisonment not to exceed one (1) year, or both such fine and imprison-
ment.
(3) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a law enforcement
officer who wears a mask or other device that covers, hides, or conceals any
portion of the officer's face while operating within the scope and course of
the officer's employment.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to preclude
prosecution or penalties under any other applicable law.
SECTION 2. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.